Colorado, session 2026A, SB152.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. Legislative declaration. (1) The general assembly
finds and declares that:
(a) Automated vehicle identification systems, referred to in this
section as "AVIS", are used for the limited purpose of enforcing specific
traffic violations, including speeding and red-light violations, and are
subject to statutory requirements, governing notice, signage, and due
process;
(b) Conversely, automated license plate reader systems, referred to
in this section as "ALPR systems", are distinct technologies from AVIS and
are used primarily for law enforcement and investigative purposes,
including to locate stolen vehicles or support criminal investigations;
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

(c) The provisions of this act apply only to AVIS and civil traffic
enforcement;
(d) This act does not regulate, limit, or otherwise affect the use of
ALPR systems, and nothing in this act is intended to expand, restrict, or
modify existing law governing ALPR systems; and
(e) Given the differences between AVIS as a traffic enforcement
tool and ALPR systems as a broader surveillance technology, it is important
to maintain a simple distinction between the systems and make clear that the
provisions in this act are limited accordingly.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 42-4-110.5, amend (2)
introductory portion, (2)(d)(II)(B), (2)(e), (2)(g)(I.7), (2)(g)(IV), (2)(h), (4),
(4.5)(a), (4.6)(b), (4.6)(d)(I), and (5); repeal (1.5); and add (1.1)(a)(III),
(1.1)(a.5), and (2)(i) as follows:
42-4-110.5. Automated vehicle identification systems - school
buses - exceptions to liability - penalty - contracting - limits on use of
photographs and video - rules - legislative declaration - definitions -
repeal.
(1.1) As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:
(a) (III) "AUTOMATED VEHICLE IDENTIFICATION SYSTEM" DOES NOT
INCLUDE AUTOMATED LICENSE PLATE READER SYSTEMS.
(a.5) (I) "MOBILE AUTOMATED VEHICLE IDENTIFICATION SYSTEM"
MEANS AN AUTOMATED VEHICLE IDENTIFICATION SYSTEM DESIGNED TO
DETECT TRAFFIC VIOLATIONS AND THAT:
(A) IS CAPABLE OF BEING RELOCATED BETWEEN ENFORCEMENT
LOCATIONS;
(B) MAY BE INSTALLED WITHIN OR MOUNTED TO A MOTOR VEHICLE,
INCLUDING A VAN, SPORT UTILITY VEHICLE, OR SIMILAR VEHICLE PLATFORM;
(C) DOES NOT INCLUDE A DEVICE OR SYSTEM INSTALLED IN OR
MOUNTED TO A TRAILER; AND
PAGE 2-SENATE BILL 26-152

(D) IS GENERALLY USED TO PROVIDE FLEXIBILITY TO ADDRESS
TEMPORARY ENFORCEMENT IN HIGH-RISK TRAFFIC AREAS OR SHIFTING
TRAFFIC PATTERNS.
(II) A DEVICE OR SYSTEM INSTALLED IN OR MOUNTED TO A TRAILER
IS CONSIDERED MOBILE IF IT IS MOVED TO A NEW LOCATION WITHIN
SEVENTY-TWO HOURS AFTER BEING DEPLOYED OR IS DEPLOYED IN A
MAINTENANCE, REPAIR, OR CONSTRUCTION ZONE DESIGNATED PURSUANT TO
SECTION 42-4-614 OR A SCHOOL ZONE AS DEFINED IN SECTION 42-4-615.
(1.5) Nothing in this section applies to a violation detected by an
automated vehicle identification system for driving twenty-five miles per
hour or more in excess of the reasonable and prudent speed or twenty-five
miles per hour or more in excess of the maximum speed limit of
seventy-five miles per hour detected by the use of an automated vehicle
identification system.
(2) A county, city and county, or municipality may adopt an
ordinance authorizing the use of an automated vehicle identification system
to detect violations of traffic regulations adopted by the county, city and
county, or municipality, or the state, a county, a city and county, or a
municipality may utilize an automated vehicle identification system to
detect traffic violations under state law, subject to the following conditions
and limitations and, as applicable, the requirements for state highways set
forth in and any rules adopted by the department of transportation pursuant
to subsection (2.5) of this section, AS APPLICABLE, AND THE FOLLOWING
CONDITIONS AND LIMITATIONS:
(d) (II) Except as provided in subsection (2)(d)(I) of this section, an
automated vehicle identification system designed to detect disobedience to
a traffic control signal or another violation of this article 4 or a local traffic
ordinance shall not be used unless the state, county, city and county, or
municipality using such system conspicuously posts a sign notifying the
public that an automated vehicle identification system is in use immediately
ahead. The sign shall:
(B) Use lettering that is at least four inches high for upper case
letters and two and nine-tenths THREE inches high for lower case letters.
(e) (I) If the state, A county, A city and county, or A municipality
PAGE 3-SENATE BILL 26-152

implements a new automated vehicle identification system after July 1,
2023, that is not a replacement of an EXISTING automated vehicle
identification system:
(A) The agency responsible for the automated vehicle identification
system shall publicly announce the implementation of the system through
its website AND SOCIAL MEDIA ACCOUNTS, IF ANY, for at least thirty days
prior to the use of the system; and
(B) THE AGENCY RESPONSIBLE FOR THE AUTOMATED VEHICLE
IDENTIFICATION SYSTEM SHALL POST A SIGN ANNOUNCING THE UPCOMING
USE OF AN AUTOMATED VEHICLE IDENTIFICATION SYSTEM AT EACH
LOCATION WHERE AN AUTOMATED VEHICLE IDENTIFICATION SYSTEM WILL
BE INSTALLED AT LEAST THIRTY DAYS BEFORE THE AUTOMATED VEHICLE
IDENTIFICATION SYSTEM IS UTILIZED, AND THE SIGN MUST USE LETTERING
THAT IS AT LEAST FOUR INCHES HIGH FOR UPPERCASE LETTERS AND THREE
INCHES HIGH FOR LOWERCASE LETTERS; AND
(B) (C) For the first thirty days after the system is installed or
deployed, only warnings may be issued for violations of a county or
municipal traffic regulation or traffic violation under state law detected by
the system. SUCH WARNINGS MUST BE ISSUED AND DELIVERED IN WRITING.
(II) A THE state, county, city and county, or municipality may
conduct an extended public information campaign or warning period OR
POST ADDITIONAL SIGNS for systems EACH NEW SYSTEM installed or
deployed either before or after July 1, 2023 BEYOND THE MINIMUM
REQUIREMENTS IN SUBSECTIONS (2)(e)(I)(A), (2)(e)(I)(B), AND (2)(e)(I)(C)
OF THIS SECTION.
(III) THE REQUIREMENTS SET FORTH IN THIS SUBSECTION (2)(e) DO
NOT APPLY TO A MOBILE AUTOMATED VEHICLE IDENTIFICATION SYSTEM
THAT HAS BEEN MOVED TO A NEW LOCATION WITHIN THE SAME ESTABLISHED
AUTOMATED VEHICLE IDENTIFICATION CORRIDOR.
(g) (I.7) Before the state, a county, A city and county, or A
municipality begins operation of an automated vehicle identification system
in an automated vehicle identification corridor, the state, county, city and
county, or municipality must:
PAGE 4-SENATE BILL 26-152

(A) Post a permanent sign in a conspicuous place not fewer than
three hundred feet before the beginning of the corridor; and
(B) Post a permanent sign not fewer than three hundred feet before
each static camera within the corridor thereafter or a temporary sign not
fewer than three hundred feet before any mobile camera; except that, for an
automated vehicle identification corridor on which IF an automated vehicle
identification system is used on transit vehicles for the purpose of detecting
WILL BE USED EXCLUSIVELY TO DETECT unauthorized use of a transit-only
lane, THE STATE, COUNTY, CITY AND COUNTY, OR MUNICIPALITY MUST post
permanent signs at one-half mile or more frequent intervals WITHIN THE
AUTOMATED VEHICLE IDENTIFICATION CORRIDOR; and
(C) Illustrate, through data collected within the past five years
QUANTITATIVE DATA COLLECTION, incidents of crashes, speeding, OR
reckless driving or community complaints WITHIN THE PAST FIVE YEARS on
a street designated as an automated vehicle identification corridor, unless
the automated vehicle identification system will be used exclusively to
detect unauthorized usage of one or more transit-only lanes USE OF A
TRANSIT-ONLY LANE. COMMUNITY COMPLAINTS MAY ALSO BE USED TO
ILLUSTRATE THE NEED FOR AN AUTOMATED VEHICLE IDENTIFICATION
CORRIDOR IF COLLECTED WITH QUANTITATIVE DATA.
(IV) The state, a county, a city and county, or a municipality
implementing an automated vehicle identification corridor pursuant to
subsection (2)(g)(I) of this section shall ANNUALLY publish a report on its
website disclosing the number of citations and AMOUNT OF revenue
generated by the automated vehicle identification corridor.
(h) (I) The state, a county, a city and county, or a municipality shall
not require a registered owner of a vehicle to disclose the identity of a
driver of the vehicle who is detected through the use of an automated
vehicle identification system. However, the registered owner may be
required to submit evidence that the owner was not the driver at the time of
the alleged violation. THE REGISTERED OWNER OF THE MOTOR VEHICLE
DETECTED BY THE AUTOMATED VEHICLE IDENTIFICATION SYSTEM IS
RESPONSIBLE FOR PAYING THE CIVIL PENALTY ASSOCIATED WITH THE NOTICE
OF THE VIOLATION UNLESS:
(A) THE REGISTERED OWNER ESTABLISHES THAT THE MOTOR
PAGE 5-SENATE BILL 26-152

VEHICLE HAD BEEN SOLD OR LEASED PRIOR TO THE TIME OF THE VIOLATION
DETECTED BY THE AUTOMATED VEHICLE IDENTIFICATION SYSTEM BY
PROVIDING A BILL OF SALE OR OTHER DOCUMENTATION TO SHOW THAT THE
MOTOR VEHICLE WAS SOLD, LEASED, OR TRANSFERRED BEFORE THE DATE
AND TIME OF THE VIOLATION;
(B) THE REGISTERED OWNER ESTABLISHES THAT THE MOTOR
VEHICLE HAD BEEN STOLEN PRIOR TO THE TIME OF THE VIOLATION DETECTED
BY THE AUTOMATED VEHICLE IDENTIFICATION SYSTEM BY PROVIDING A COPY
OF THE POLICE REPORT TO SHOW THAT THE OWNER'S LICENSE PLATE OR
MOTOR VEHICLE WAS STOLEN BEFORE THE DATE AND TIME OF THE
VIOLATION;
(C) THE REGISTERED OWNER ESTABLISHES THAT LAW ENFORCEMENT
ISSUED A SEPARATE TRAFFIC CITATION TO THE REGISTERED OWNER OR
DRIVER OF THE MOTOR VEHICLE FOR THE VIOLATION DETECTED BY THE
AUTOMATED VEHICLE IDENTIFICATION SYSTEM; OR
(D) A REPRESENTATIVE OF THE ESTATE OR A FAMILY MEMBER OF THE
REGISTERED OWNER ESTABLISHES THAT THE REGISTERED OWNER WAS
DECEASED PRIOR TO THE DATE OF THE VIOLATION DETECTED BY THE
AUTOMATED VEHICLE IDENTIFICATION SYSTEM.
(II) (A) TO ESTABLISH THAT THE REGISTERED OWNER IS NOT
RESPONSIBLE FOR PAYING A CIVIL PENALTY ASSOCIATED WITH A NOTICE OF
VIOLATION, THE REGISTERED OWNER OR A REPRESENTATIVE OF THE ESTATE
OR A FAMILY MEMBER OF THE REGISTERED OWNER MUST, WITHIN THIRTY
DAYS AFTER THE DATE OF ISSUANCE OF THE NOTICE OF VIOLATION, PROVIDE
TO THE ENTITY THAT ISSUED THE NOTICE OF VIOLATION AN AFFIDAVIT WITH
INFORMATION SHOWING THAT ONE OF THE EXCEPTIONS SET FORTH IN
SUBSECTION (2)(h)(I) OF THIS SECTION APPLIES. THE AFFIDAVIT MUST
INCLUDE THE CIVIL PENALTY NUMBER.
(B) THE REGISTERED OWNER OF A MOTOR VEHICLE THAT WAS
LEASED AT THE TIME OF THE VIOLATION IS NOT REQUIRED TO SUBMIT AN
AFFIDAVIT IF THE MOTOR VEHICLE WAS REGISTERED IN THE NAME OF THE
LESSEE AT THE TIME OF THE VIOLATION.
(III) IF THE REGISTERED OWNER TO WHOM A NOTICE OF VIOLATION
HAS BEEN ISSUED IS DECEASED, THE AFFIDAVIT MUST INCLUDE BOTH A
PAGE 6-SENATE BILL 26-152

CERTIFIED COPY OF THE DEATH CERTIFICATE SHOWING THAT THE DEATH OF
THE REGISTERED OWNER OCCURRED BEFORE THE DATE OF THE VIOLATION
AND ONE OF THE FOLLOWING:
(A) A BILL OF SALE OR OTHER DOCUMENT SHOWING THAT THE
MOTOR VEHICLE WAS SOLD OR TRANSFERRED AFTER THE DATE OF THE
REGISTERED OWNER'S DEATH AND BEFORE THE DATE OF THE VIOLATION;
(B) DOCUMENTED PROOF THAT THE REGISTERED LICENSE PLATE
BELONGING TO THE REGISTERED OWNER WAS RETURNED TO THE
DEPARTMENT OR ANOTHER OFFICE OR AUTHORIZED AGENT OF THE
DEPARTMENT AFTER THE DATE OF THE REGISTERED OWNER'S DEATH AND
BEFORE THE DATE OF THE VIOLATION; OR
(C) A COPY OF THE POLICE REPORT SHOWING THAT THE REGISTERED
OWNER'S LICENSE PLATE OR MOTOR VEHICLE WAS STOLEN AFTER THE DATE
OF THE REGISTERED OWNER'S DEATH AND BEFORE THE DATE OF THE
VIOLATION.
(IV) UPON RECEIPT OF THE AFFIDAVIT AND SUFFICIENT SUPPORTING
DOCUMENTATION PURSUANT TO THIS SUBSECTION (2)(h), THE STATE, A
COUNTY, A CITY AND COUNTY, OR A MUNICIPALITY SHALL DISMISS THE
NOTICE OF VIOLATION AND PROVIDE PROOF OF THE DISMISSAL TO THE
REGISTERED OWNER OR OTHER PERSON THAT SUBMITTED THE AFFIDAVIT.
(V) A PERSON THAT SUBMITS A FALSE AFFIDAVIT COMMITS A CLASS
2 MISDEMEANOR TRAFFIC OFFENSE AND, UPON CONVICTION, SHALL BE
PUNISHED AS PROVIDED IN SECTION 42-4-1701 (3).
(i) (I) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (2)(i)(II) OF THIS
SECTION, IF A VARIABLE SPEED LIMIT IS IN EFFECT OR A SPEED LIMIT IS
OTHERWISE TEMPORARILY LOWERED DUE TO HAZARDOUS WEATHER OR
OTHER TRAFFIC CONDITIONS, THE STATE, A COUNTY, A CITY AND COUNTY, OR
A MUNICIPALITY SHALL ONLY ISSUE A NOTICE OF VIOLATION AND CIVIL
PENALTY FOR A VIOLATION DETECTED BY AN AUTOMATED VEHICLE
IDENTIFICATION SYSTEM IF THE VIOLATION IS A SPEEDING VIOLATION THAT
EXCEEDS THE REGULAR MAXIMUM POSTED SPEED LIMIT FOR THAT LOCATION
THAT IS TYPICALLY IN EFFECT WHEN A VARIABLE SPEED LIMIT IS NOT IN
EFFECT AND THE SPEED LIMIT IS NOT OTHERWISE TEMPORARILY LOWERED.
PAGE 7-SENATE BILL 26-152

(II) SUBSECTION (2)(i)(I) OF THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY WHEN A
SPEED LIMIT IS TEMPORARILY LOWERED DUE TO THE NEED FOR A TEMPORARY
MAINTENANCE, REPAIR, OR CONSTRUCTION ZONE DESIGNATED PURSUANT TO
SECTION 42-4-614.
(4) (a) (I) If, THROUGH THE USE OF AN AUTOMATED VEHICLE
IDENTIFICATION SYSTEM, the state, a county, a city and county, or a
municipality detects a speeding violation of less than ten SIX miles per hour
over the reasonable and prudent speed under a county or municipal traffic
regulation or under state law, through the use of an automated vehicle
identification system and the violation is the first violation by the registered
owner that the state, county, city and county, or municipality has detected
using an automated vehicle identification system, then the state, county, city
and county, or municipality may mail the registered owner a warning
regarding the violation. but The state, county, city and county, or
municipality shall not impose any A penalty or surcharge for such first A
violation UNLESS THE VIOLATION OCCURS WITHIN A SCHOOL ZONE, AS
DEFINED IN SECTION 42-4-615, OR WITHIN A MAINTENANCE, REPAIR, OR
CONSTRUCTION ZONE DESIGNATED PURSUANT TO SECTION 42-4-614, IN
WHICH CASE THE MAXIMUM PENALTY THAT THE STATE, COUNTY, CITY AND
COUNTY, OR MUNICIPALITY MAY IMPOSE FOR SUCH VIOLATION, INCLUDING
ANY SURCHARGE, IS FORTY DOLLARS.
(II) IF, THROUGH THE USE OF AN AUTOMATED VEHICLE
IDENTIFICATION SYSTEM, THE STATE, A COUNTY, A CITY AND COUNTY, OR A
MUNICIPALITY DETECTS A SPEEDING VIOLATION OF AT LEAST SIX AND LESS
THAN TEN MILES PER HOUR OVER THE REASONABLE AND PRUDENT SPEED
UNDER A COUNTY OR MUNICIPAL TRAFFIC REGULATION OR UNDER STATE
LAW, AND THE VIOLATION IS THE FIRST VIOLATION BY THE REGISTERED
OWNER THAT THE STATE, COUNTY, CITY AND COUNTY, OR MUNICIPALITY HAS
DETECTED USING AN AUTOMATED VEHICLE IDENTIFICATION SYSTEM, THEN
THE STATE, COUNTY, CITY AND COUNTY, OR MUNICIPALITY SHALL MAIL THE
REGISTERED OWNER A WARNING REGARDING THE VIOLATION. THE STATE,
COUNTY, CITY AND COUNTY, OR MUNICIPALITY SHALL NOT IMPOSE A
PENALTY OR SURCHARGE FOR SUCH FIRST VIOLATION.
(III) (A) NOTWITHSTANDING SUBSECTION (4)(a)(II) OF THIS SECTION,
IF, BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2035, THROUGH THE USE OF AN AUTOMATED VEHICLE
IDENTIFICATION SYSTEM, THE STATE, A COUNTY, A CITY AND COUNTY, OR A
MUNICIPALITY DETECTS A SPEEDING VIOLATION OF AT LEAST SIX AND LESS
PAGE 8-SENATE BILL 26-152

THAN TEN MILES PER HOUR OVER THE REASONABLE AND PRUDENT SPEED IN
A SCHOOL ZONE AS DEFINED IN SECTION 42-4-615, OR WITHIN A
MAINTENANCE, REPAIR, OR CONSTRUCTION ZONE DESIGNATED PURSUANT TO
SECTION 42-4-614, AND THE VIOLATION IS THE FIRST VIOLATION BY THE
REGISTERED OWNER, THE MAXIMUM PENALTY THAT THE STATE, COUNTY,
CITY AND COUNTY, OR MUNICIPALITY MAY IMPOSE FOR SUCH VIOLATION,
INCLUDING ANY SURCHARGE, IS FORTY DOLLARS.
(B) THIS SUBSECTION (4)(a)(III) IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE JANUARY
1, 2036.
(IV) NOTWITHSTANDING SUBSECTION (4)(a)(II) OF THIS SECTION,
BEGINNING JANUARY 1, 2035, IF, THROUGH THE USE OF AN AUTOMATED
VEHICLE IDENTIFICATION SYSTEM, THE STATE, A COUNTY, A CITY AND
COUNTY, OR A MUNICIPALITY DETECTS A SPEEDING VIOLATION OF AT LEAST
SIX AND LESS THAN TEN MILES PER HOUR OVER THE REASONABLE AND
PRUDENT SPEED IN A SCHOOL ZONE AS DEFINED IN SECTION 42-4-615, OR
WITHIN A MAINTENANCE, REPAIR, OR CONSTRUCTION ZONE DESIGNATED
PURSUANT TO SECTION 42-4-614, AND THE VIOLATION IS THE FIRST
VIOLATION BY THE REGISTERED OWNER, THE MAXIMUM PENALTY THAT THE
STATE, COUNTY, CITY AND COUNTY, OR MUNICIPALITY MAY IMPOSE FOR
SUCH VIOLATION, INCLUDING ANY SURCHARGE, IS FIFTY DOLLARS.
(b) (I) (A) If, BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2035, THROUGH THE USE OF AN
AUTOMATED VEHICLE IDENTIFICATION SYSTEM, the state, a county, a city and
county, or a municipality detects a second or subsequent speeding violation
BY A REGISTERED OWNER OF AT LEAST SIX AND LESS THAN TEN MILES PER
HOUR OVER THE REASONABLE AND PRUDENT SPEED under a county or
municipal traffic regulation or under state law, by the registered owner, or
a first such SPEEDING violation by the registered owner if the provisions of
subsection (4)(a) of this section do not apply, through the use of an
automated vehicle identification system OF AT LEAST TEN AND LESS THAN
TWENTY-FIVE MILES PER HOUR OVER THE REASONABLE AND PRUDENT SPEED,
then, except as may be permitted in subsection (4)(b)(II) of this section, the
maximum penalty that the state, county, city and county, or municipality
may impose for such violation, including any surcharge, is forty dollars.
(B) THIS SUBSECTION (4)(b)(I) IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE JANUARY 1,
2036.
PAGE 9-SENATE BILL 26-152

(I.5) BEGINNING JANUARY 1, 2035, IF, THROUGH THE USE OF AN
AUTOMATED VEHICLE IDENTIFICATION SYSTEM, THE STATE, A COUNTY, A
CITY AND COUNTY, OR A MUNICIPALITY DETECTS A SECOND OR SUBSEQUENT
SPEEDING VIOLATION BY A REGISTERED OWNER OF AT LEAST SIX AND LESS
THAN TEN MILES PER HOUR OVER THE REASONABLE AND PRUDENT SPEED
UNDER A COUNTY OR MUNICIPAL TRAFFIC REGULATION OR UNDER STATE
LAW, OR A SPEEDING VIOLATION BY THE REGISTERED OWNER OF AT LEAST
TEN AND LESS THAN TWENTY-FIVE MILES PER HOUR OVER THE REASONABLE
AND PRUDENT SPEED, THEN, EXCEPT AS MAY BE PERMITTED IN SUBSECTION
(4)(b)(II) OF THIS SECTION, THE MAXIMUM PENALTY THAT THE STATE,
COUNTY, CITY AND COUNTY, OR MUNICIPALITY MAY IMPOSE FOR SUCH
VIOLATION, INCLUDING ANY SURCHARGE, IS FIFTY DOLLARS.
(II) If any A violation described in subsection (4)(b)(I) OR (4)(b)(I.5)
of this section occurs within a school zone as defined in section 42-4-615,
OR WITHIN A MAINTENANCE, REPAIR, OR CONSTRUCTION ZONE DESIGNATED
PURSUANT TO SECTION 42-4-614, the maximum penalty that may be imposed
shall be IS doubled.
(III) Subsection (4)(b)(I) of this section does not apply within a
maintenance, construction, or repair zone designated pursuant to section
42-4-614 or a school zone, as defined in section 42-4-615 (2).
(c) (I) (A) IF, BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2035, THROUGH THE USE OF AN
AUTOMATED VEHICLE IDENTIFICATION SYSTEM, THE STATE, A COUNTY, A
CITY AND COUNTY, OR A MUNICIPALITY DETECTS A SPEEDING VIOLATION BY
A REGISTERED OWNER OF TWENTY-FIVE MILES PER HOUR OR MORE OVER THE
REASONABLE AND PRUDENT SPEED UNDER A COUNTY OR MUNICIPAL TRAFFIC
REGULATION OR UNDER STATE LAW, THE MAXIMUM PENALTY THAT THE
STATE, COUNTY, CITY AND COUNTY, OR MUNICIPALITY MAY IMPOSE FOR
SUCH VIOLATION, INCLUDING ANY SURCHARGE, IS ONE HUNDRED TWENTY
DOLLARS.
(B) THIS SUBSECTION (4)(c)(I) IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE JANUARY 1,
2036.
(II) BEGINNING JANUARY 1, 2035, IF, THROUGH THE USE OF AN
AUTOMATED VEHICLE IDENTIFICATION SYSTEM, THE STATE, A COUNTY, A
CITY AND COUNTY, OR A MUNICIPALITY DETECTS A SPEEDING VIOLATION BY
A REGISTERED OWNER OF TWENTY-FIVE MILES PER HOUR OR MORE OVER THE
PAGE 10-SENATE BILL 26-152

REASONABLE AND PRUDENT SPEED UNDER A COUNTY OR MUNICIPAL TRAFFIC
REGULATION OR UNDER STATE LAW, THE MAXIMUM PENALTY THAT THE
STATE, COUNTY, CITY AND COUNTY, OR MUNICIPALITY MAY IMPOSE FOR
SUCH VIOLATION, INCLUDING ANY SURCHARGE, IS ONE HUNDRED FIFTY
DOLLARS.
(4.5) (a) (I) (A) If, BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2035, the state, a county, a
city and county, or a municipality detects a violation of a county, city and
county, or municipal traffic regulation or traffic violation under state law
for disobedience to a traffic control signal through the use of an automated
vehicle identification system, the maximum civil penalty that the state, a
county, a city and county, or a municipality may impose for such violation,
including any surcharge, is seventy-five dollars.
(B) THIS SUBSECTION (4.5)(a)(I) IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE JANUARY
1, 2036.
(II) BEGINNING JANUARY 1, 2035, IF THE STATE, A COUNTY, A CITY
AND COUNTY, OR A MUNICIPALITY DETECTS A VIOLATION OF A COUNTY, CITY
AND COUNTY, OR MUNICIPAL TRAFFIC REGULATION OR TRAFFIC VIOLATION
UNDER STATE LAW FOR DISOBEDIENCE TO A TRAFFIC CONTROL SIGNAL
THROUGH THE USE OF AN AUTOMATED VEHICLE IDENTIFICATION SYSTEM,
THE MAXIMUM CIVIL PENALTY THAT THE STATE, COUNTY, CITY AND COUNTY,
OR MUNICIPALITY MAY IMPOSE FOR SUCH VIOLATION, INCLUDING ANY
SURCHARGE, IS NINETY-FIVE DOLLARS.
(4.6) (b) (I) (A) If, BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2035, through the use of an
automated vehicle identification system, the state, a county, a city and
county, or a municipality detects a motor vehicle overtaking a stopped
school bus with actuated visual signal lights in violation of section
42-4-1903 (1)(a), the maximum civil penalty the state, county, city and
county, or municipality may impose for the violation is three hundred
dollars, including surcharges or fees.
(B) THIS SUBSECTION (4.6)(b)(I) IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE JANUARY
1, 2036.
(II) BEGINNING JANUARY 1, 2035, IF, THROUGH THE USE OF AN
AUTOMATED VEHICLE IDENTIFICATION SYSTEM, THE STATE, A COUNTY, A
CITY AND COUNTY, OR A MUNICIPALITY DETECTS A MOTOR VEHICLE
PAGE 11-SENATE BILL 26-152

OVERTAKING A STOPPED SCHOOL BUS WITH ACTUATED VISUAL SIGNAL
LIGHTS IN VIOLATION OF SECTION 42-4-1903 (1)(a), THE MAXIMUM CIVIL
PENALTY THE STATE, COUNTY, CITY AND COUNTY, OR MUNICIPALITY MAY
IMPOSE FOR THE VIOLATION IS THREE HUNDRED SEVENTY-FIVE DOLLARS,
INCLUDING SURCHARGES OR FEES.
(d) (I) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER PROVISION IN THIS SECTION,
the state, a county, a city and county, a school district, or a municipality that
has installed an automated vehicle identification system on a school bus to
detect a motor vehicle overtaking a stopped school bus shall not use any
portion of a fine collected through the use of such system as the basis for
payment to the manufacturer or vendor of the automated vehicle
identification system equipment. The compensation paid by the state,
county, city and county, school district, or municipality for such equipment
must be based upon the value of any equipment or services provided and
must not be based exclusively upon the number of traffic citations issued or
the revenue generated by the automated vehicle identification system
equipment.
(5) If the state, a county, a city and county, or a municipality has
established an automated vehicle identification system for the enforcement
of county or municipal traffic regulations or state traffic laws, then no
portion of any fine collected through the use of such system may be paid to
the manufacturer or vendor of the automated vehicle identification system
equipment. The compensation paid by the state, county, city and county, or
municipality for such equipment shall:
(a) Be based upon the value of such equipment and the value of any
services provided to the state, county, city and county, or municipality; and
may
(b) (I) Not be based upon the number of traffic citations issued or
the AMOUNT OF revenue generated by such equipment or services; OR
(II) BE STRUCTURED AS A FLAT MONTHLY FEE OR A FLAT HOURLY
RATE THAT IS NOT CONTINGENT UPON, AND DOES NOT VARY BASED ON, THE
NUMBER OF TRAFFIC CITATIONS ISSUED OR THE AMOUNT OF REVENUE
GENERATED; AND
(c) NOT INCLUDE ANY INCENTIVES, BONUSES, ESCALATORS, OR
PAGE 12-SENATE BILL 26-152

OTHER PROVISIONS THAT ARE DIRECTLY TIED TO THE NUMBER OF CITATIONS
ISSUED OR THE AMOUNT OF REVENUE GENERATED.
SECTION 3. Act subject to petition - effective date -
applicability. (1) This act takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following
the expiration of the ninety-day period after final adjournment of the
general assembly (August 12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13,
2026); except that, if a referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3)
of article V of the state constitution against this act or an item, section, or
part of this act within such period, then the act, item, section, or part will
not take effect unless approved by the people at the general election to be
held in November 2026 and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the
official declaration of the vote thereon by the governor.
PAGE 13-SENATE BILL 26-152

(2) This act applies to conduct occurring or contracts entered into or
renewed on or after the applicable effective date of this act.
____________________________ ____________________________
James Rashad Coleman, Sr. Julie McCluskie
PRESIDENT OF SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE
THE SENATE OF REPRESENTATIVES
____________________________ ____________________________
Esther van Mourik Vanessa Reilly
SECRETARY OF CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE
THE SENATE OF REPRESENTATIVES
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 14-SENATE BILL 26-152